Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1873.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 4, Chapter 368, O.S.L.
2025 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 1151.25a), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 1151.25a. A. Except as otherwise provided in the
Roofing Contractor Registration Act, on and after the effective date
of this act beginning January 1, 2027, every roofing contractor,
except for those defined in subsection G of this section, offering
to engage in or engaging in performing residential roofing
contractor work in this state shall be required to receive a
residential roofing endorsement. To receive a residential roofing
endorsement, the roofing contractor shall be required to take and

successfully pass a residential roofing examination approved under
the provisions of this act the Roofing Contractor Registration Act
with a minimum score of seventy percent (70%), and be in compliance
with all other provisions of this act the Roofing Contractor
Registration Act and rules before acting or being endorsed as a
residential roofing contractor. For applicants who have been
registered and in good standing with the Construction Industries
Board on the effective date of this act on January 1, 2027, there
shall be a twelve-month grandfathering-in period from the effective
date of this act January 1, 2027, to January 1, 2028, to either pass
the exam or complete an additional ten (10) hours of continuing
education credits approved in advance by the Committee of Roofing
Examiners to be granted a residential roofer endorsement. Any
applicant who has been registered, is in good standing with the
Board, and possesses a current commercial roofer endorsement on the
effective date of this act January 1, 2027, shall be exempt from the
residential roofing examination and additional ten (10) hours of
continuing education credits required to receive a residential
roofing endorsement.
B. Examinations for a residential roofer endorsement shall be
uniform and practical in nature and sufficiently strict to test the
qualifications and fitness of the applicants for endorsement.
Examinations shall be in whole or in part in writing. Examinations
shall be offered at least monthly; dates, times, and locations shall
be determined by the registrar or third-party vendor with approval
of the registrar.
C. Any applicant initially failing to pass the examination
shall not be permitted to take another examination for a period of
thirty (30) days. Any applicant subsequently failing to pass the
examination shall not be permitted to take another examination for a
period of ninety (90) days. However, in a declared state of
emergency, the examination shall be available as often as possible
as determined by the registrar.
D. No residential roofer endorsement shall be renewed unless
the qualifying party has completed the required hours of continuing
education pursuant to subsection A of this section, as determined
and approved by the Committee of Roofing Examiners.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1873 Page 2

E. For all new applicants not registered and in good standing
with the Construction Industries Board on or prior to the effective
date of this act January 1, 2027, the Construction Industries Board
shall issue a residential roofer endorsement to qualifying
applicants no sooner than thirty (30) days from the date of
successful completion of the exam. New applicants shall not be
allowed to sell, offer, bid, inspect, or perform any residential
roofing contractor work in this state until a residential roofer
endorsement is issued.
F. For all applicants registered and in good standing with the
Construction Industries Board on or prior to the effective date of
this act January 1, 2027:
1. The residential roofer endorsement shall be issued
immediately upon compliance with the provisions of this section; and
2. Applicants shall be allowed to continue residential roofing
contractor work at all times during the residential roofer
endorsement application process, until January 1, 2028, when all
persons shall have a valid residential roofer endorsement to perform
residential roofing work unless otherwise exempted under the Roofing
Contractor Registration Act.
G. The residential roofing endorsement shall not apply to
roofing labor contractors who:
1. Only provide roofing construction labor services;
2. Are working directly for a registered roofing contractor
that possesses a residential roofing endorsement; and
3. Are not providing any materials.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1873 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 26th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 29th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1873 Page 4